Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201584-305.01
Prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who willfully fails to comply with the provisions of section 84-305 or who otherwise willfully obstructs or hinders the conduct of an audit, examination, or related activity by the Auditor of Public Accounts or who willfully misleads or attempts to mislead any person charged with the duty of conducting such audit, examination, or related activity shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2015, LB539, § 11.